New York, session 2025-2026, S8466.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Fentanyl Fathers and Mothers act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds and 4 declares that: 5 (a) Fentanyl abuse and drug poisoning have become a significant public 6 health crisis, with deadly consequences, particularly among youth; 7 (b) Public awareness, education, and the ability to recognize the 8 signs of fentanyl poisoning are essential to saving lives; 9 (c) Bereaved parents, who have lost children to fentanyl, can provide 10 the most compelling and impactful testimony to educate students on the 11 dangers of fentanyl; and 12 (d) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to mandate compre- 13 hensive fentanyl education and awareness in New York schools by leverag- 14 ing personal stories from bereaved parents, providing students with 15 essential life-saving knowledge, and ensuring that naloxone is available 16 to protect against overdose deaths. Through these measures, this act 17 aims to save lives and prevent further tragedy due to fentanyl. 18 § 3. Subdivisions 2 and 4 of section 804 of the education law, as 19 amended by chapter 390 of the laws of 2016, are amended to read as 20 follows: 21 2. All schools shall include, as an integral part of health education, 22 instruction so as to discourage the misuse and abuse of alcohol, tobacco 23 and other drugs, including fentanyl and other synthetic opioids, and 24 promote attitudes and behavior that enhance health, well being, and 25 human dignity. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11972-02-5 S. 8466 2 1 4. Instruction regarding alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs, including 2 fentanyl and other synthetic opioids, in addition to continued health 3 guidance in the junior high school grades and the senior high schools, 4 shall be an integral part of a required health education course at each 5 of these levels in the secondary schools curriculum. Students shall be 6 required to demonstrate knowledge in the subject area through the use of 7 a test, graded project or report, or any other means prescribed by the 8 school authorities regarding alcohol, drugs, and tobacco, including 9 fentanyl and other synthetic opioids. Any such course shall be taught by 10 teachers holding a certificate to teach health. Related courses in the 11 secondary school curriculum shall be taught in a manner supportive of 12 health education regarding alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs, including 13 fentanyl and other synthetic opioids. In addition, instruction regarding 14 the dangers of driving while under the influence of alcohol or drugs 15 shall be an integral part of a required health education course in the 16 senior high schools. Such instruction shall be provided in all senior 17 high schools whether or not these schools also provide driver education 18 courses. 19 § 4. The education law is amended by adding a new section 804-e to 20 read as follows: 21 § 804-e. Fentanyl education, awareness and recognition. 1. The depart- 22 ment, in consultation with the department of health, shall develop and 23 adopt a comprehensive fentanyl education, awareness, and recognition 24 program for all public, charter, and private schools in the state. 25 2. The program shall include, at a minimum, instruction on the follow- 26 ing topics: 27 (a) the nature of fentanyl and its analogs, risks, and lethal dose; 28 (b) the dangers of unprescribed pills, especially those laced with 29 fentanyl; 30 (c) recognition of fentanyl overdose symptoms, including how to admin- 31 ister naloxone and use fentanyl test strips; 32 (d) stories from bereaved parents who have lost children to fentanyl 33 poisoning; and 34 (e) strategies to resist peer pressure to use drugs and the harmful 35 effects of fentanyl. 36 3. Each public school district and private school shall ensure that 37 students in grades six through twelve receive this education annually as 38 part of the health education curriculum. The curriculum should be taught 39 by certified health education teachers. 40 4. The education on fentanyl shall be an integral part of the health 41 education curriculum required for students in grades six through twelve. 42 Each school shall provide an annual, school-wide assembly or class-based 43 instruction on fentanyl awareness and drug poisoning, including the 44 following elements: 45 (a) a film with real-life testimonies from individuals impacted by 46 fentanyl; 47 (b) naloxone training and overdose recognition; 48 (c) presentation of facts on fentanyl's risks, including the Drug 49 Enforcement Administration's "One Pill Can Kill" sheet; 50 (d) bereaved parent presentations sharing authentic experiences; and 51 (e) surveys to measure student understanding and intent to avoid drug 52 use post-instruction. 53 5. The department shall provide sample instructional materials and 54 resources to assist schools in implementing the program. Schools shall 55 collect and report feedback from students and faculty to assess the S. 8466 3 1 program's effectiveness in raising awareness and preventing fentanyl 2 abuse. 3 6. (a) All public and private high schools shall ensure the availabil- 4 ity of naloxone on school grounds. The department of health shall 5 provide training for school staff on the proper use of naloxone and 6 other opioid antagonists. Schools may also receive free naloxone 7 donations from organizations like FentanylFathers.org. 8 (b) Each school must provide instructional materials that teach 9 students, faculty, and staff how to recognize signs of an overdose and 10 properly administer naloxone. 11 7. (a) Schools shall be encouraged to invite bereaved parents who have 12 lost children to fentanyl to speak during fentanyl education assemblies. 13 These speakers will provide real-life stories of loss and hope, empha- 14 sizing the critical importance of prevention and awareness. 15 (b) Schools shall be encouraged to establish students advocating 16 fentanyl education (S.A.F.E.) clubs, with assistance from FentanylFa- 17 thers.org, that will empower students to spread awareness about fentanyl 18 risks within their communities. 19 8. Schools shall collect data on student engagement and understanding 20 through pre- and post-surveys, as well as on the use of naloxone. This 21 data will be submitted to the department annually to assess the effec- 22 tiveness of the program and guide future improvements. 23 § 5. The legislature shall appropriate funding to support the imple- 24 mentation of this act, including the creation of educational materials, 25 training programs, naloxone distribution, and program evaluation. 26 § 6. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 27 the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to school 28 years commencing on or after such effective date.